Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.6q of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Prior to the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year, the


State Department of Education shall develop and make available to


public high schools in this state a curriculum for students in ninth


through twelfth grades to address awareness and prevention of


domestic violence and human trafficking. The curriculum shall:



Req. No. 2302 Page 1


1. Teach students how to recognize, prevent, and seek help for


domestic violence and human trafficking;


2. Teach students the warning signs of dating violence and


abusive behavior including both physical and emotional abuse;


3. Promote safe and healthy relationships and student well-


being including healthy relationship communication skills; and


4. Be medically accurate and appropriate for the age of the


students.


B. The curriculum required by subsection A of this section may


be taught as a stand-alone unit of instruction or may be integrated


into one or more existing courses of study.


C. The State Department of Education shall post the curriculum


on its website and shall identify resources that school districts


can use to implement the provisions of this section.


D. School districts in this state may begin teaching the


concepts provided for in subsection A of this section during the


2027-2028 school year.


E. A school district that teaches the concepts provided for in


subsection A of this section shall provide an option for the parent


or legal guardian of a student to opt the student out of the


curriculum.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 2302 Page 2


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2302 EB 12/1/2025 10:36:27 AM









































Req. No. 2302 Page 3